Nebraska, session 109, LB681.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB681 LB681
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 85-931, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-931 Graduate degree programs means shall mean those programs for
which the following degrees are awarded:
(1) First professional degree being the first earned degree in the
following fields: (a) Dentistry; (b) medicine, general; (c) optometry;
(d) osteopathic medicine; (e) pharmacy; (f) podiatry; (g) veterinary
medicine; (h) chiropractic; (i) law, general; (j) theology, general; and
(k) architecture, general;
(2)(a) (2) Master's degree being the earned degree carrying the
title Master. The master's degree is the first advanced graduate degree
conferred in professional programs and general academic and occupational
programs.
(b) Master's degree professional programs include, but are not
limited to: (i) (a) Engineering; (ii) (b) education; (iii) (c) allied
health professions; (iv) (d) nursing; (v) (e) architecture, specialties;
(vi) (f) community and regional planning; (vii) (g) dentistry; (viii) (h)
medicine, specialties; (ix) (i) optometry; (x) (j) osteopathic medicine;
(xi) (k) pharmacy; (xii) (l) podiatry; (xiii) (m) social work; (xiv) (n)
veterinary medicine; (xv) (o) chiropractic; (xvi) (p) law, specialties;
and (xvii) (q) theology, specialties.
(c) Master's degree programs in general academic and occupational
areas include but are not limited to: (i) (a) Mathematics; (ii) (b)
languages; (iii) (c) biological and physical sciences; (iv) (d) letters;
(v) (e) fine arts; (vi) (f) social sciences; (vii) (g) agriculture and
natural resources; (viii) (h) communications; (ix) (i) business and
management; (x) (j) computer and information sciences; (xi) (k) home
economics; and (xii) (l) fine and applied arts; and
(3) Doctoral degree being an earned academic degree conveying the
title of Doctor. Doctoral degrees include, but are not limited to: Doctor
of Philosophy; Doctor of Education; and Doctor of Arts.
-2-

LB681 LB681
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Original section 85-931, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-